Washington statutes.
RCW 39.26.310

Purchasing and procurement policies—Products containing hydrofluorocarbons—Report to the legislature.

(1) The department shall establish purchasing and procurement policies that provide a preference for products that:

(a) Are not restricted under RCW 70A.60.060;

(b) Do not contain hydrofluorocarbons or contain hydrofluorocarbons with a comparatively low global warming potential;

(c) Are not designed to function only in conjunction with hydrofluorocarbons characterized by a comparatively high global warming potential; and

(d) Were not manufactured using hydrofluorocarbons or were manufactured using hydrofluorocarbons with a low global warming potential.

(2) No agency may knowingly purchase products that are not accorded a preference in the purchasing and procurement policies established by the department pursuant to subsection (1) of this section, unless there is no cost-effective and technologically feasible option that is accorded a preference.

(3) The department shall establish a purchasing and procurement policy that provides a preference, in serving existing equipment, for a reclaimed refrigerant that meets the minimum quality requirement established in federal regulations adopted under 42 U.S.C. Sec. 7671(g).

(4)(a) Nothing in subsection (1) of this section requires the department or any other state agency to breach an existing contract or dispose of stock that has been ordered or is in the possession of the department or other state agency as of July 28, 2019.

(b) Nothing in subsection (3) of this section requires the department or any other state agency to breach an existing contract or dispose of stock that has been ordered or is in the possession of the department or other state agency as of July 28, 2021.

(5) By December 1, 2020, and each December 1st of even-numbered years thereafter, the department must submit a status report to the appropriate committees of the house of representatives and senate regarding the implementation and compliance of the department and state agencies with this section.

[ 2021 c 315 s 19; 2021 c 65 s 28; 2019 c 284 s 9.]

NOTES:

Reviser's note: This section was amended by 2021 c 65 s 28 and by 2021 c 315 s 19, each without reference to the other. Both amendments are incorporated in the publication of this section under RCW 1.12.025(2). For rule of construction, see RCW 1.12.025(1).

Explanatory statement—2021 c 65: See note following RCW 53.54.030.

Finding—Intent—2019 c 284: See notes following RCW 70A.60.060.